Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.60.080

Public disclosure transparency account. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

The public disclosure transparency account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from penalties collected pursuant to enforcement actions or settlements under this title, including any fees or costs, must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Moneys in the account may be used only for the implementation of chapter 304, Laws of 2018 and duties under this title, and may not be used to supplant general fund appropriations to the commission.

[ 2024 c 164 s 497; 2018 c 304 s 18. Formerly RCW 42.17A.785.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Finding—Intent—2018 c 304: See note following RCW 29B.25.090.